Georgia, session 2025_26, HB30.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
(a) As used in this Act, the term:
(1) "Ad valorem taxes for educational purposes" means all ad valorem taxes for
educational purposes levied by, for, or on behalf of the Catoosa County school district,
including, but not limited to, any ad valorem taxes to pay interest on and to retire county
school district bonded indebtedness.
H. B. 30
- 1 -

LC 47 3264S/AP
(2) "Homestead" means homestead as defined and qualified in Code Section 48-5-40 of
the O.C.G.A., as amended.
(3) "Senior citizen" means a person who is 67 years of age or older on or before
January 1 of the year in which application for the exemption under subsection (b) of this
section is made.
(b) Each resident of the Catoosa County school district who is a senior citizen is granted an
exemption on such person's homestead from Catoosa County school district ad valorem taxes
for educational purposes in the amount of $100,000.00 of the assessed value of such
homestead. The value of that property in excess of such exempted amount shall remain
subject to taxation.
(c) A person shall not receive the homestead exemption granted by subsection (b) of this
section unless such person or person's agent files an application with the tax commissioner
of Catoosa County, giving such person's age and such additional information relative to
receiving such exemption as will enable the tax commissioner of Catoosa County to make
a determination regarding the initial and continuing eligibility of such person for such
exemption. The tax commissioner of Catoosa County shall provide application forms for this
purpose.
(d) The exemption shall be claimed and returned as provided in Code Section 48-5-50.1 of
the O.C.G.A., as amended. The exemption shall be automatically renewed from year to year
so long as the person granted the homestead exemption under subsection (b) of this section
occupies the residence as a homestead. After such person has filed the proper application as
provided in subsection (c) of this section, it shall not be necessary to make application
thereafter for any year, and such exemption shall continue to be allowed to such person. It
shall be the duty of any such person granted the homestead exemption under subsection (b)
of this section to notify the tax commissioner of Catoosa County in the event that such person
for any reason becomes ineligible for such exemption.
H. B. 30
- 2 -

LC 47 3264S/AP
(e) The exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall not apply to or affect any
state ad valorem taxes, county ad valorem taxes for county purposes, municipal ad valorem
taxes for municipal purposes, or independent school district ad valorem taxes for educational
purposes. The homestead exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall be in lieu
of and not in addition to any other homestead exemption applicable to Catoosa County
school district ad valorem taxes for educational purposes.
(f) The exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall apply to all taxable years
beginning on or after January 1, 2027.
SECTION 2.
In accordance with the requirements of Article VII, Section II of the Constitution of the State
of Georgia, this Act shall not become law unless it receives the requisite two-thirds' majority
vote in both the Senate and the House of Representatives.
SECTION 3.
The election superintendent of Catoosa County shall call and conduct an election as provided
in this section for the purpose of submitting this Act to the electors of the Catoosa County
school district for approval or rejection. The election superintendent shall conduct that
election on the date of the 2026 general primary and shall issue the call and conduct that
election as provided by general law. The election superintendent shall cause the date and
purpose of the election to be published once a week for two weeks immediately preceding
the date thereof in the official organ of Catoosa County. The ballot shall have written or
printed thereon the words:
H. B. 30
- 3 -

LC 47 3264S/AP
"( ) YES Shall the Act be approved which provides a homestead exemption from
Catoosa County school district ad valorem taxes for educational purposes
( ) NO in the amount of $100,000.00 of the assessed value of the homestead for
residents of that school district who are 67 years of age or older?"
All persons desiring to vote for approval of the Act shall vote "Yes," and all persons desiring
to vote for rejection of the Act shall vote "No." If more than one-half of the votes cast on
such question are for approval of the Act, Section 1 of this Act shall become of full force and
effect on January 1, 2027. If the Act is not so approved or if the election is not conducted
as provided in this section, Section 1 of this Act shall not become effective, and this Act shall
be automatically repealed on the first day of July immediately following that election date.
The expense of such election shall be borne by Catoosa County. It shall be the election
superintendent's duty to certify the result thereof to the Secretary of State. The provisions
of this section shall be mandatory upon the election superintendent and are not intended as
directory. If the election superintendent fails or refuses to comply with this section, any
elector of the Catoosa County school district may apply for a writ of mandamus to compel
the election superintendent to perform his or her duties under this section. If the court finds
that the election superintendent has not complied with this section, the court shall fashion
appropriate relief requiring the election superintendent to call and conduct such election on
the date required by this section or on the next date authorized for special elections provided
for in Code Section 21-2-540 of the O.C.G.A.
SECTION 4.
Except as otherwise provided in Section 3 of this Act, this Act shall become effective upon
its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.
SECTION 5.
H. B. 30
- 4 -

LC 47 3264S/AP
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 30
- 5 -